Florida, session 2026, SB586.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âPart XIV of chapter 559, Florida Statutes, 32 consisting of ss. 559.971-559.976, is created and entitled 33 âRepair of Mobility Devices.â 34 Section 2.âSection 559.971, Florida Statutes, is created to 35 read: 36 559.971âShort title.âThis part may be cited as the âRight 37 to Repair Act for Mobility Devices.â 38 Section 3.âSection 559.972, Florida Statutes, is created to 39 read: 40 559.972âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 41 (1)ââAuthorized repair providerâ means an individual or a 42 business that has an arrangement with the original equipment 43 manufacturer under which the original equipment manufacturer 44 grants to the individual or business a license to use a trade 45 name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the 46 purposes of offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or 47 repair of a mobility device under the name of the original 48 equipment manufacturer, or other arrangement with the original 49 equipment manufacturer to offer such services on behalf of the 50 original equipment manufacturer. An original equipment 51 manufacturer that offers the services of diagnosis, maintenance, 52 or repair of its own mobility device, and that does not have an 53 arrangement with an unaffiliated individual or business, is 54 considered an authorized repair provider with respect to 55 mobility devices. 56 (2)ââDocumentationâ means a manual, diagram, reporting 57 output, service code description, schematic diagram, security 58 code, password, or any other guidance or information used in 59 effecting the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a 60 mobility device. 61 (3)ââFair and reasonable termsâ means making available 62 documentation, tools, or parts as follows: 63 (a)âDocumentation made available by the original equipment 64 manufacturer at no charge, except that when a physical copy is 65 requested, a charge may be included for the reasonable actual 66 costs of preparing and sending the copy. 67 (b)âTools made available by the original equipment 68 manufacturer at no charge: 69 1.âWithout requiring authorization or Internet access for 70 use or operation of the tools. 71 2.âWithout imposing impediments to access or use the tools 72 to diagnose, maintain, or repair and enable full functionality 73 of digital electronic equipment. 74 3.âIn a manner that does not impair the efficient and cost 75 effective performance of any such diagnosis, maintenance, or 76 repair. 77 78 However, if a tool is requested in physical form, a charge may 79 be included for the reasonable actual costs of preparing and 80 sending the tool. 81 (c)âParts made available by the original equipment 82 manufacturer, either directly or through an authorized repair 83 provider, to independent repair providers and owners at costs 84 and terms that are equivalent to the most favorable costs and 85 terms under which an original equipment manufacturer offers the 86 parts to an authorized repair provider, and that: 87 1.âAccounts for a discount, rebate, convenient and timely 88 means of delivery, means of enabling fully restored and updated 89 functionality, rights of use, or: 90 a.âAny other incentive or preference the original 91 manufacturer offers to an authorized repair provider; or 92 b.âAny additional cost or impediment the original equipment 93 manufacturer imposes on an owner or independent repair provider. 94 2.âAre not conditioned upon or do not impose a substantial 95 obligation or restriction that is not reasonably necessary for 96 enabling the owner or independent repair provider to engage in 97 the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of equipment made by or on 98 behalf of the original equipment manufacturer. 99 3.âAre not conditioned upon an arrangement with the 100 original equipment manufacturer. 101 (4)ââIndependent repair providerâ means an individual or 102 business operating in this state which is unaffiliated with an 103 original equipment manufacturer and which is engaged in the 104 services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of mobility 105 devices. 106 (5)ââOriginal equipment manufacturerâ means a business 107 engaged in selling, leasing, or supplying new mobility devices 108 designed for individuals with physical disabilities including, 109 but not limited to, power wheelchairs, manual wheelchairs, 110 mobility scooters, and power assist devices for manual 111 wheelchairs which are manufactured by or on behalf of such 112 business for sale to an individual or business. 113 (6)ââOwnerâ means an individual or business that owns or 114 leases a mobility device purchased or used in this state. 115 (7)ââPartâ means any replacement part, either new or used, 116 made available by an original equipment manufacturer for 117 purposes of effecting the services of maintenance or repair of a 118 mobility device manufactured by or on behalf of, sold, or 119 otherwise supplied by the original equipment manufacturer. 120 (8)ââToolâ means any software, hardware, or other apparatus 121 used for the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of a mobility 122 device, including, but not limited to, software or any other 123 mechanism that programs a new part, calibrates functionality, or 124 performs any other function required to return the mobility 125 device to its fully functional condition, which includes any 126 updates. 127 (9)ââTrade secretâ has the same meaning as in s. 688.002. 128 Section 4.âSection 559.973, Florida Statutes, is created to 129 read: 130 559.973âRequirements.â 131 (1)âFor mobility devices and parts for mobility devices 132 that are sold or used in this state, an original equipment 133 manufacturer must make available to any independent repair 134 provider or owner by, on behalf of, or sold by such original 135 equipment manufacturer, on fair and reasonable terms, any 136 documentation, parts, and tools required for the diagnosis, 137 maintenance, or repair of such devices and parts, which includes 138 any updates. The documentation, parts, and tools must be made 139 available either directly by the original equipment manufacturer 140 or by an authorized repair provider. 141 (2)âFor equipment that contains an electronic security lock 142 or other security-related function, the original equipment 143 manufacturer must make available to an owner or independent 144 repair provider, on fair and reasonable terms, any special 145 documentation, tools, and parts required to access and reset the 146 lock or function when disabled in the course of diagnosis, 147 maintenance, or repair of the mobility device. The 148 documentation, parts, and tools may be made available through 149 appropriate secure release systems. 150 Section 5.âSection 559.974, Florida Statutes, is created to 151 read: 152 559.974âEnforcement.âA violation of this part is punishable 153 under the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices Act. 154 Section 6.âSection 559.975, Florida Statutes, is created to 155 read: 156 559.975âLimitations.â 157 (1)âThis part does not require an original equipment 158 manufacturer to divulge a trade secret to an owner or 159 independent service provider. 160 (2)âThis part does not alter the terms of an arrangement 161 between an authorized repair provider and an original equipment 162 manufacturer, including, but not limited to, the performance or 163 provision of warranty or recall repair work by an authorized 164 repair provider on behalf of an original equipment manufacturer 165 and pursuant to such arrangement. However, any terms that waive, 166 avoid, restrict, or limit the original equipment manufacturerâs 167 obligation to comply with this part are void. 168 (3)âAn original equipment manufacturer or an authorized 169 repair provider is not liable for any damage or injury caused by 170 an independent repair provider or owner to a mobility device 171 which occurs during the course of repair, diagnosis, or 172 maintenance. 173 Section 7.âSection 559.976, Florida Statutes, is created to 174 read: 175 559.976âApplicability.âThis part applies with respect to 176 mobility devices sold or in use on or after July 1, 2026. 177 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.